Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4418.01
Purchasing group; premium taxes.

Premium taxes and taxes on premiums paid for coverage of risks resident or located in this state by a purchasing group or any members of the purchasing group shall be:

(1) Imposed at the same rate and subject to the same interest, fines, and penalties as applicable to premium taxes and taxes on premiums paid for similar coverage from a similar insurance source by other insureds; and

(2) Paid first by such insurance source if an insurer admitted in this state and, if not an insurer admitted in this state, by the surplus lines licensee acting as agent or broker for the purchasing group.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 56.